Utah statutes.
59-12-208.1.   Enactment or repeal of tax -- Effective date -- Notice
requirements.
(1)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  "Annexation" means an annexation to:
(i)  a county under Title 17, Chapter 2, Annexation to County; or
(ii)  a city or town under Title 10, Chapter 2, Part 4, Annexation.
(b)  "Annexing area" means an area that is annexed into a county, city, or
town.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(c) or (d), if, on or after July
1, 2004, a county, city, or town enacts or repeals a tax under this part, the
enactment or repeal shall take effect:
(i)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(ii)  after a 90-day period beginning on the date the commission receives
notice meeting the requirements of Subsection (2)(b) from the county, city, or
town.
(b)  The notice described in Subsection (2)(a)(ii) shall state:
(i)  that the county, city, or town will enact or repeal a tax under this
part;
(ii)  the statutory authority for the tax described in Subsection (2)(b)(i);
(iii)  the effective date of the tax described in Subsection (2)(b)(i); and
(iv)  if the county, city, or town enacts the tax described in Subsection
(2)(b)(i), the rate of the tax.
(c) (i) The enactment of a tax shall take effect on the first day of the first
billing period:
(A)  that begins after the effective date of the enactment of the tax; and
(B)  if the billing period for the transaction begins before the effective
date of the enactment of the tax under Section 59-12-204.
(ii) The repeal of a tax shall take effect on the first day of the last
billing period:
(A)  that began before the effective date of the repeal of the tax; and
(B)  if the billing period for the transaction begins before the effective
date of the repeal of the tax imposed under Section 59-12-204.
(d) (i) If a tax due under this chapter on a catalogue sale is computed on the
basis of sales and use tax rates published in the catalogue, an enactment or
repeal of a tax described in Subsection (2)(a) takes effect:
(A)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  beginning 60 days after the effective date of the enactment or repeal
under Subsection (2)(a).
(ii)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may by rule define the term "catalogue sale."
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(c) or (d), if, for an annexation
that occurs on or after July 1, 2004, the annexation will result in the
enactment or repeal of a tax under this part for an annexing area, the
enactment or repeal shall take effect:
(i)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(ii)  after a 90-day period beginning on the date the commission receives
notice meeting the requirements of Subsection (3)(b) from the county, city, or
town that annexes the annexing area.
(b)  The notice described in Subsection (3)(a)(ii) shall state:
(i)  that the annexation described in Subsection (3)(a) will result in an
enactment or repeal of a tax under this part for the annexing area;
(ii)  the statutory authority for the tax described in Subsection (3)(b)(i);
(iii)  the effective date of the tax described in Subsection (3)(b)(i); and
(iv)  the rate of the tax described in Subsection (3)(b)(i).
(c) (i) The enactment of a tax shall take effect on the first day of the first
billing period:
(A)  that begins after the effective date of the enactment of the tax; and
(B)  if the billing period for the transaction begins before the effective
date of the enactment of the tax under Section 59-12-204.
(ii) The repeal of a tax shall take effect on the first day of the last
billing period:
(A)  that began before the effective date of the repeal of the tax; and
(B)  if the billing period for the transaction begins before the effective
date of the repeal of the tax imposed under Section 59-12-204.
(d) (i) If a tax due under this chapter on a catalogue sale is computed on the
basis of sales and use tax rates published in the catalogue, an enactment or
repeal of a tax described in Subsection (3)(a) takes effect:
(A)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  beginning 60 days after the effective date of the enactment or repeal
under Subsection (3)(a).
(ii)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may by rule define the term "catalogue sale."
